Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-564
Aging, Alzheimer's, and Dementia Advisory Council; members; terms; duties; expenses.

(1) The Aging, Alzheimer's, and Dementia Advisory Council is created and shall include:

(a) Fourteen voting members appointed by the Governor. The voting members shall consist of: (i) An individual living with Alzheimer's disease or another dementia or a family member or care partner with experience caring for such an individual; (ii) an individual who is a state representative of a nationwide organization that advocates for individuals living with Alzheimer's disease or other dementia; (iii) an individual who is a state representative of a nationwide organization that advocates for aging adults; (iv) a medical professional with experience diagnosing or treating Alzheimer's disease or other dementia; (v) a medical or licensed professional with experience working with aging populations; (vi) an individual who conducts research relating to Alzheimer's disease and other dementia issues; (vii) an individual who represents long-term care; (viii) an individual who represents nursing facilities; (ix) an individual who represents nonmedical home and community-based services, including home care, respite, or adult day care services; (x) an individual who represents assisted-living facilities; (xi) one representative from each congressional district representing a planning-and-service area as designated in the Nebraska Community Aging Services Act; and (xii) an individual with experience with vulnerable aging populations; and

(b) Five nonvoting members. The nonvoting members shall consist of: (i) The Director of Public Health or the director's designee; (ii) the Director of Disability and Aging or the director's designee; (iii) the administrator of the State Unit on Aging or the administrator's designee; (iv) a representative of the Nebraska Workforce Development Board designated by the board; and (v) the state long-term care ombudsman or the ombudsman's designee.

(2) The terms of the initial members shall begin on the date of the first meeting as called by the Director of Public Health and (a) one-third shall serve for two-year terms, (b) one-third shall serve for three-year terms, and (c) one-third shall serve for four-year terms, including the chairperson and vice-chairperson. Thereafter all members shall serve four-year terms. Members may not serve more than two consecutive four-year terms. Vacancies shall be appointed by the Governor in the same manner as described in subdivision (1)(a) of this section.

(3) Members of the council shall select the chairperson and vice-chairperson who shall not be employees of the state and may serve in such role for up to four consecutive years. The Director of Public Health or the director's designee shall call and preside over the first meeting until a chairperson is selected. Thereafter, the council shall meet at least quarterly at the call of the chairperson. A majority of the voting members shall constitute a quorum for the conduct of meetings.

(4) The council shall hold meetings at least once every calendar quarter.

(5) Members shall serve on the council without compensation but shall be compensated for expenses incurred for such service as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

(6) The department shall provide staff and support to the council as necessary to assist the council in the performance of its duties.

Laws 2022, LB752, § 33;

Laws 2024, LB903, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB867, § 15.
July 18, 2026